Texas, session 892, SB39.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that when a health care provider accepts a bonus, kickback, or any other form of remuneration from a vaccine manufacturer for administering an immunization to a person, the health care provider has a conflict of interest and is less likely to counsel a person on the benefits and risks of immunization before obtaining the person's written informed consent as required by law. SECTION 2.  The heading to Section 32.102, Family Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 32.102.  WRITTEN INFORMED CONSENT TO IMMUNIZATION; CERTAIN REMUNERATION PROHIBITED; ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY; CIVIL LIABILITY. SECTION 3.  Section 32.102, Family Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a) and (c) and adding Subsections (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h) to read as follows: (a)  Before administering an immunization to a child, a health care provider must obtain the written informed consent of a [A] person authorized to consent to [the] immunization of the [a] child [has the responsibility to ensure that the consent, if given, is an informed consent]. The person authorized to consent is not required to be present when [the] immunization of the child is requested if a consent form that meets the requirements of Section 32.002 has been given to the health care provider. (c)  As part of the information given in the counseling for informed consent, the health care provider shall provide [information to inform] the person authorized to consent to immunization with information regarding: (1)  the benefits and risks of immunization, including any vaccine information statement required by the National Childhood Vaccine Injury Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. Section 300aa-1 et seq.); and (2)  [of] the procedures available under the National Childhood Vaccine Injury Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. Section 300aa-1 et seq.) to seek possible recovery for unreimbursed expenses for certain injuries arising out of the administration of certain vaccines. (d)  If a health care provider fails to obtain the written informed consent required by Subsection (a) and the child has an adverse reaction to the immunization that is required by federal law to be reported to the federal Vaccine Adverse Event Reporting System, the provider is liable to the person authorized to consent to the immunization for damages in an amount not to exceed $10,000. In an action brought under this subsection, a claimant may also recover reasonable expenses incurred in bringing the action, including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, investigation costs, witness fees, and deposition expenses. (e)  Sections 41.003 and 41.004, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, do not apply to an action brought under this section. (f)  A health care provider may not accept a bonus, kickback, or any other form of remuneration from a vaccine manufacturer for administering an immunization to a child, except for the necessary costs of administering the immunization. (g)  If a health care provider violates Subsection (f), written informed consent obtained by the provider under Subsection (a) is not valid. (h)  A health care provider who violates Subsection (f) is subject to disciplinary action by the state licensing agency that regulates the provider.  On determining the provider committed a violation, the agency shall impose an administrative penalty against the provider in an amount that equals the greater of: (1)  $5,000; or (2)  10 times the monetary value of the remuneration the provider received from the vaccine manufacturer in relation to the immunization that is the subject of the violation. SECTION 4.  Section 32.103(b), Family Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  A person consenting to immunization of a child, a physician, nurse, or other health care provider, or a public health clinic, hospital, or other medical facility is not liable for damages arising from an immunization administered to a child authorized under this subchapter except for injuries resulting from the person's or facility's own acts of negligence. For purposes of this subsection, an immunization administered to a child is not authorized under this subchapter if the physician, nurse, or other health care provider failed to obtain written informed consent as required by Section 32.102. SECTION 5.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to a cause of action that accrues on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 6.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect September 1, 2025.